Massachusetts, session 194th, H763.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. (a)  Notwithstanding any special or general law to the contrary, there shall 
be a special commission to investigate and assess the feasibility of state-sponsored prescription 
drug manufacturing or distribution in the commonwealth. The special commission shall consist 
of: the secretary of health and human services or a designee, who shall serve as chair; the 
commissioner of insurance or a designee; the executive director of the center for health 
information and analysis or a designee; the executive director of the health policy commission or 
a designee; the president of the board of registration in pharmacy or a designee; the president of 
the University of Massachusetts or a designee; and 11 persons selected by the chair, 1 of whom 
shall be a representative of the Massachusetts Biotechnology Council, Inc., 1 of whom shall be a 
representative of the Massachusetts Health and Hospital Association, Inc., 1 of whom shall be a 
representative of the Massachusetts Medical Society, 1 of whom shall be a representative of a 
patient advocacy organization, 1 of whom shall be a representative of an advocacy organization 

of 4 13 representing patients with lack of access to pharmaceutical products, including but not limited to, 
insulin, naloxone, albuterol inhalers and epinephrine, 1 of whom shall be a representative of a 
representative of the office of pharmaceutical policy and analysis established under the section 3 
of chapter 342 of the acts of 2024, 1 of whom shall be an individual with expertise in biomedical 
research, 1 of whom shall be a physician licensed to practice medicine under section 2 of chapter 
112 of the General Laws with expertise in the treatment of diabetes and related complications, 1 
of whom shall be a physician licensed under said section 2 of said chapter 112 with expertise in 
the treatment of substance use disorders and related complications, 1 of whom shall be a 
physician licensed under said section 2 of said chapter 112 with expertise in the treatment of 
allergic reactions and related complications and 1 of whom shall be a physician licensed under 
said section 2 of said chapter 112 with expertise in the treatment of asthma and related 
complications. 
(b) The special commission shall study and report on the feasibility of state-sponsored 
drug manufacturing or distribution in the commonwealth. The special commission shall: (i) study 
the feasibility of manufacturing commonly used pharmaceutical products and their analogs, 
including but not limited to insulin, naloxone, albuterol inhalers and epinephrine; (ii) assess the 
feasibility of providing the drug and drug analogs to low-income residents of the commonwealth 
at no-cost or at a reduced cost on a means-tested basis; (iii) assess the feasibility of partnerships 
between the commonwealth and other entities, including but not limited to, public universities 
and existing drug manufacturers, or partnerships between other appropriate entities and an 
existing drug manufacturer to leverage existing research and manufacturing capacity; (iv) 
analyze if establishing a state-sponsored drug manufacturing program of commonly used 
pharmaceutical products and their analogs, including but not limited, to the drugs listed in clause 

of 4 36 (i) of subsection (b), would lower prescription drug prices for public and private purchasers and 
consumers (v) study the example of other states that have initiated state-sponsored drug 
manufacturing and distribution initiatives; and (vi) issue a report on the commission’s findings 
and policy recommendations. 
(c) In its assessment, the commission shall consider the following factors: (i) the number 
of low-income residents who currently require the drugs listed in clause (i) of subsection (b); (ii) 
the ability of the commonwealth, the public university system or other appropriate entity, by 
themselves or in partnership with existing drug manufacturers, to produce the drugs listed in 
clause (i) of subsection (b); (iii) any long-term cost savings and revenue generation for the 
commonwealth; (iv) any long-term cost savings and other benefits to low-income residents of the 
commonwealth who would receive the drugs listed in clause (i) of subsection (b); (v) any costs to 
the commonwealth to produce the drugs listed in clause (i) of subsection (b), including additional 
administrative costs; (vi) state and federal regulatory or legal obstacles, including requirements 
for licensure, to the production and distribution of the drugs listed in clause (i) of subsection (b) 
within the commonwealth; (vii) available alternative methods for providing the drugs listed in 
clause (i) of subsection (b) to low-income residents of the commonwealth at low or no cost; (viii) 
options for capping copayments for the drugs listed in clause (i) of subsection (b) provided 
through private insurers; (ix) the potential for state-sponsored manufacturing of the drugs listed 
in clause (i) of subsection (b) to address drug shortages; (x) the potential for the commonwealth 
to engage in volume purchasing of the drugs listed in clause (i) of subsection (b) at reduced cost; 
(xi) the mechanisms by which the commonwealth could establish a program to distribute the 
drugs listed in clause (i) of subsection (b) to residents of the commonwealth; (xii) opportunities 
to establish an interstate compact with other New England states to reduce costs; (xiii) 

of 4 59 opportunities to establish a public entity to manage the manufacturing, purchasing or distribution 
of the drugs listed in clause (i) of subsection (b); (xiv) opportunities to establish a model facility 
to affordably manufacture the drugs listed in clause (i) of subsection (b); and (xv) opportunities 
to procure dedicated funding to support the manufacture and distribution of the drugs listed in 
clause (i) of subsection (b) to residents of the commonwealth. 
(d) Not later than September 1, 2026, the commission shall submit its report to the clerks 
of the senate and house of representatives, the joint committee on health care financing and the 
joint committee on public health.